Utah statutes.
63A-9-809.   Authority of state or local subdivision to receive property -- Revocation of authority of officer.

(1)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the governing board or the executive director of any state department, instrumentality, or agency or the legislative body of any city, county, school district, or other political subdivision may by order or resolution give any officer or employee the authority to:

(a)  secure the transfer to it of surplus property through the division under the provisions of Section 203(j) of the Federal Property and Administrative Services Act of 1949, as amended; and

(b)  obligate the state or political subdivision and its funds to the extent necessary to comply with the terms and conditions of those transfers.

(2)  The authority conferred upon any officer or employee by an order or resolution remains in effect until:

(a)  the order or resolution is revoked; and

(b)  the division has received written notice of the revocation.

